Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.090

Certification requirements.

(1) The secretary shall issue a certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the secretary's satisfaction that the following requirements have been met:

(a) Completion of:

(i) An educational program approved by the secretary;

(ii) An apprenticeship program reviewed by the substance use disorder certification advisory committee, approved by the secretary, and registered and approved under chapter 49.04 RCW; or

(iii) Alternate training that meets established criteria;

(b) Successful completion of an approved examination, based on core competencies of substance use disorder counseling; and

(c) Successful completion of an experience requirement that establishes fewer hours of experience for applicants with higher levels of relevant education. In meeting any experience requirement established under this subsection, the secretary may not require more than one thousand five hundred hours of experience in substance use disorder counseling for applicants who are licensed under chapter 18.83 RCW or under chapter 18.79 RCW as *advanced registered nurse practitioners.

(2) The secretary shall establish by rule what constitutes adequate proof of meeting the criteria.

(3) Applicants are subject to the grounds for denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(4) Certified substance use disorder professionals shall not be required to be registered under chapter 18.19 RCW or licensed under chapter 18.225 RCW.

(5) As of July 28, 2019, a person certified under this chapter holding the title of chemical dependency professional is considered to hold the title of substance use disorder professional until such time as the person's present certification expires or is renewed.

[ 2021 c 165 s 2; 2019 c 444 s 5; 2001 c 251 s 30; 1998 c 243 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Rules—2021 c 165: See note following RCW 18.205.095.

Severability—2001 c 251: See RCW 18.225.900.